Maryland, session 2026, HB1452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 12. PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY.
12–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTHORITY” MEANS THE SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY.
(C) “BOARD” MEANS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE AUTHORITY.
(D) “BUFFER ZONE” MEANS THE AREA WITHIN 250 YARDS OF THE TARGET
AREA.
(E) “TARGET AREA” MEANS THE SUITLAND ROAD AND SILVER HILL ROAD
INTERSECTION CORRIDOR IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
12–1202.

HOUSE BILL 1452 3
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED TO ACCOMPLISH ITS
PURPOSES.
12–1203.
(A) THERE IS A SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY IS A BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE AND IS AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE EXERCISE BY THE AUTHORITY OF A POWER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IS THE PERFORMANCE OF AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION.
(D) THE GOVERNOR MAY SHALL INCLUDE EACH YEAR IN THE STATE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $500,000 TO THE AUTHORITY IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(E) BEGINNING FISCAL YEAR 2036, THE AUTHORITY SHALL BE
SELF–SUSTAINING.
12–1204.
(A) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(1) THERE EXISTS WITHIN VARIOUS NEIGHBORHOODS IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY, PARTICULARLY THE SUITLAND ROAD AND SILVER HILL ROAD
INTERSECTION CORRIDOR, A NEED FOR RESIDENTIAL AND COMMERCIAL
DEVELOPMENT OR REDEVELOPMENT IN FURTHERANCE OF THE PUBLIC’S INTEREST;
(2) THE SUITLAND ROAD AND SILVER HILL ROAD INTERSECTION
CORRIDOR HAS EXPERIENCED LOW HOUSING AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT IN THE
COMMUNITY FOR DECADES;
(3) AREAS IN THE SUITLAND ROAD AND SILVER HILL ROAD
INTERSECTION CORRIDOR INCLUDE BOTH AREAS THAT ARE CONSIDERED SLUM OR
BLIGHTED AND AREAS THAT ARE DETERIORATED OR SUBJECT TO FURTHER
DETERIORATING CONDITION, AND THOSE AREAS ARE IN NEED OF DEVELOPMENT OR
REDEVELOPMENT FOR THE PUBLIC BENEFIT;
(4) THE REVITALIZATION OF AREAS WITHIN THE SUITLAND ROAD
AND SILVER HILL ROAD INTERSECTION CORRIDOR NEEDING COMMERCIAL
DEVELOPMENT OR REDEVELOPMENT IS AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION

HOUSE BILL 1452
AND IS A PUBLIC USE THAT WILL CONFER A PUBLIC BENEFIT ON CITIZENS OF
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BY:
(I) RELIEVING CONDITIONS OF UNEMPLOYMENT;
(II) ENCOURAGING THE INCREASE OF COMMERCE AND A
BALANCED ECONOMY;
(III) ASSISTING IN THE RETENTION OF BUSINESSES AND
RESIDENTS;
(IV) ATTRACTING NEW INDUSTRIES AND COMMERCE;
(V) PROMOTING ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND GROWTH; AND
(VI) GENERALLY PROMOTING THE HEALTH, WELFARE, AND
PUBLIC SAFETY OF RESIDENTS IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY AND INCREASING
PROPERTY TAX REVENUES FOR THE STATE AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(5) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF THIS PUBLIC AUTHORITY TO PROVIDE
FINANCIAL RESOURCES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND ESTABLISHMENT OF
RESIDENCES AND BUSINESSES THROUGH COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS IN THE
TARGET AREA WILL SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
NEIGHBORHOODS AND INCREASE PROPERTY TAX REVENUES FOR THE STATE AND
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
(6) THE AUTHORITY IS THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
FOR THE STATE TO BENEFIT THE NEIGHBORHOODS OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
WITHIN THE TARGET AREA.
(B) THE LEGISLATIVE PURPOSES OF THE AUTHORITY ARE TO:
(1) REVIVE THE VARIOUS COMMUNITIES ALONG THE SUITLAND ROAD
AND SILVER HILL ROAD INTERSECTION CORRIDOR IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(2) PROMOTE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT;
(3) ENCOURAGE THE INCREASE OF BUSINESS ACTIVITY, COMMERCE,
AND A BALANCED ECONOMY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(4) HELP TO RETAIN AND ATTRACT BUSINESS ACTIVITY AND
COMMERCE IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND

HOUSE BILL 1452 5
(5) PROMOTE THE HEALTH, PUBLIC SAFETY, RIGHT OF GAINFUL
EMPLOYMENT, AND WELFARE OF RESIDENTS OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(C) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY INTENDS THAT:
(1) THE AUTHORITY OPERATE AND EXERCISE ITS CORPORATE
POWERS ALONG THE SUITLAND ROAD AND SILVER HILL ROAD INTERSECTION
CORRIDOR IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(2) WITHOUT LIMITING ITS AUTHORITY TO OTHERWISE EXERCISE ITS
POWERS, THE AUTHORITY EXERCISES ITS POWERS TO ASSIST PRIVATE REAL ESTATE
ENTITIES AND NONPROFIT COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATIONS TO
DEVELOP AND REHABILITATE HOUSING AND COMMERCIAL UNITS IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY AND SUPPORT LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AGENCIES TO
CONTRIBUTE TO THE EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION, AND RETENTION OF EXISTING
ENTERPRISES IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY AS WELL AS THE ATTRACTION OF NEW
BUSINESSES TO PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHOULD NOT OWN AND OPERATE A PROJECT
UNLESS:
(I) THE BOARD DETERMINES BY RESOLUTION THAT THE
PRIVATE SECTOR HAS NOT DEMONSTRATED SERIOUS AND SIGNIFICANT INTEREST
AND DEVELOPMENT CAPACITY TO OWN AND OPERATE THE PROJECT; OR
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT REQUESTS
IN WRITING THAT THE AUTHORITY OWN AND OPERATE THE PROJECT.
12–1205.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, IN
EXERCISING ITS POWERS, THE AUTHORITY:
(I) MAY CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE AUTHORITY
WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF ANY STATE UNIT; AND
(II) IS NOT SUBJECT TO:
1. SUBTITLES 1 THROUGH 3 OF THIS TITLE; OR
2. THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE:

HOUSE BILL 1452
A. TITLE 2, SUBTITLES 2 (GIFTS AND GRANTS) AND 5
(FACILITIES FOR THE HANDICAPPED);
B. TITLE 3 (BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT);
C. TITLE 4 (DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES);
D. TITLE 5A (DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL
PROGRAMS);
E. TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 1 (STUDIES AND ESTIMATES);
F. TITLE 7, SUBTITLES 1 (STATE OPERATING BUDGET),
2 (DISBURSEMENTS AND EXPENDITURES), AND 3 (UNSPENT BALANCES);
G. TITLE 10 (BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS –
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS); OR
H. DIVISION II (GENERAL PROCUREMENT LAW).
(2) THE AUTHORITY IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT; AND
(II) THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT.
(B) THE AUTHORITY AND ITS OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES ARE SUBJECT TO
THE PUBLIC ETHICS LAW.
(C) THE AUTHORITY AND ITS OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES ARE SUBJECT TO
TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(D) THE AUTHORITY IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
12–1206.
(A) A BOARD OF DIRECTORS SHALL MANAGE THE AUTHORITY AND
EXERCISE ITS POWERS.
(B) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:

HOUSE BILL 1452 7
(1) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND WHO REPRESENTS
THE TARGET AREA TO SERVE IN AN ADVISORY CAPACITY, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(2) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES WHO REPRESENTS
THE TARGET AREA TO SERVE IN AN ADVISORY CAPACITY, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT,
OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(4) THE SECRETARY OF TRANSPORTATION, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(6) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(7) ONE MEMBER WITH EXPERTISE IN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT,
APPOINTED BY THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY THE
DEPUTY CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, OR THE DEPUTY CHIEF’S DESIGNEE;
(8) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY COUNCIL MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS THE TARGET AREA TO SERVE IN AN
ADVISORY CAPACITY, APPOINTED BY THE CHAIR OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
COUNCIL MEMBER OF THE SUITLAND LEGACY MIXED–USE TOWN CENTER DESIGN
REVIEW COMMITTEE WHO IS THE FEDERAL REPRESENTATIVE TO THE DESIGN
REVIEW COMMITTEE, APPOINTED BY THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK
AND PLANNING COMMISSION PLANNING DIRECTOR;
(9) THE DIRECTOR OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(10) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE REDEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE;
(11) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE REVENUE AUTHORITY OF
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;

HOUSE BILL 1452
(12) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERMITTING, INSPECTIONS, AND ENFORCEMENT OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY,
OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(13) THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND PLANNING
COMMISSION’S PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY PLANNING DIRECTOR, OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(12) (13) (14) ONE SUITLAND COMMUNITY MEMBER, APPOINTED BY
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(13) (14) (15) ONE SUITLAND COMMUNITY MEMBER, APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(16) ONE SUITLAND COMMUNITY MEMBER, APPOINTED BY THE
COUNTY EXECUTIVE OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
(14) (15) (17) ONE COMMERCIAL PROPERTY OWNER WITHIN THE
TARGET AREA, APPOINTED BY THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE.
(C) (1) THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE SHALL SELECT THE CHAIR OF THE
BOARD.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL ELECT THE COCHAIR OF THE BOARD FROM THE
MEMBERS LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(3) THROUGH (6), (14), AND (15) OF THIS
SECTION.
12–1207.
(A) THE AUTHORITY MAY MANAGE APPROPRIATED FUNDS FROM PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY AND THE STATE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY RECEIVE DONATED SERVICES FROM
ACCOUNTANTS, LAWYERS, OR OTHER CONSULTANTS AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE AUTHORITY MAY SUPERVISE, MANAGE, AND TERMINATE STAFF
AND CONSULTANTS AS NECESSARY.
12–1208.
A MEMBER OF THE AUTHORITY:

HOUSE BILL 1452 9
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
AUTHORITY; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
12–1209.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL:
(1) SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT AND APPROVAL OF A
COMPREHENSIVE NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION PLAN IN THE TARGET AREA
AND THE BUFFER ZONE TO BENEFIT:
(I) THE RESIDENTS;
(II) HOUSING;
(III) NEIGHBORHOODS;
(IV) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT; AND
(V) TRANSPORTATION, INCLUDING MOTOR VEHICLES AND
PEDESTRIANS; AND
(2) WORK IN COORDINATION WITH THE RESIDENTS OF THE TARGET
AREA AND THE BUFFER ZONE TO DEVELOP A COMPREHENSIVE NEIGHBORHOOD
REVITALIZATION PLAN.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF ALL MEMBERS OF THE
AUTHORITY, MODIFY THE BOUNDARIES OF THE TARGET AREA AND THE BUFFER
ZONE.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 15, 2027, THE AUTHORITY SHALL REPORT
ITS COMPREHENSIVE NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION STRATEGY, INCLUDING ANY
PROCUREMENT ACTIVITIES UNDERTAKEN BY THE AUTHORITY, TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO
THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE ECONOMIC
MATTERS COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE.
12–1210.
THE AUTHORITY MAY:

HOUSE BILL 1452
(1) ADOPT BYLAWS FOR THE CONDUCT OF THE BUSINESS OF THE
AUTHORITY;
(2) ADOPT A SEAL;
(3) SUE OR BE SUED;
(4) MAINTAIN AN OFFICE AT A PLACE THE AUTHORITY DESIGNATES
IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(5) MAKE OR ACCEPT AND MANAGE LOANS, GRANTS, OR ASSISTANCE
OF ANY KIND FROM THE FEDERAL OR STATE GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY, A CHARITABLE INSTITUTION, A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION, A FOR–PROFIT ORGANIZATION, OR A PRIVATE SOURCE;
(6) MAKE GRANTS TO INDIVIDUALS;
(7) ACQUIRE PROPERTIES IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, DIRECTLY
OR INDIRECTLY, FROM A PERSON OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, TO IMPROVE,
MANAGE, MARKET, MAINTAIN, OR LEASE, FROM A PERSON OR POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION FOR RESIDENTIAL, COMMERCIAL, OR INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT OR
REDEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING COMPREHENSIVE RENOVATION OR REHABILITATION
OF THE LAND OR PROPERTY ON TERMS THE AUTHORITY CONSIDERS REASONABLE
TO OPERATE A PROJECT IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, BY:
(I) PURCHASE;
(II) GIFT;
(III) INTEREST;
(IV) CONDEMNATION;
(V) EMINENT DOMAIN, EXCEPT FOR:
1. OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTIES; AND
2. PROPERTY OWNED OR CONTROLLED BY THE REVENUE
AUTHORITY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY OR THE REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(VI) TAX SALE;

HOUSE BILL 1452 11
(VII) FORECLOSURE;
(VIII) RECEIVERSHIP;
(IX) IN REM FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS;
(X) EASEMENT, OR ANY OTHER INTEREST IN LAND;
(XI) LEASE; AND
(XII) RENT;
(8) ACQUIRE, PURCHASE, HOLD, LEASE AS LESSEE, AND USE:
(I) A FRANCHISE, PATENT, OR LICENSE;
(II) ANY REAL, PERSONAL, MIXED, TANGIBLE, OR INTANGIBLE
PROPERTY; OR
(III) AN INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY LISTED IN THIS ITEM;
(9) FINANCE ALL OR PART OF THE ACQUISITION OR IMPROVEMENT OF
A PROJECT;
(10) SELL, LEASE AS LESSOR, TRANSFER, LICENSE, ASSIGN, OR
DISPOSE OF PROPERTY OR A PROPERTY INTEREST THAT THE AUTHORITY
ACQUIRES;
(11) FIX AND COLLECT RATES, RENTALS, FEES, ROYALTIES, AND
CHARGES FOR SERVICES AND RESOURCES THE AUTHORITY PROVIDES OR MAKES
AVAILABLE;
(12) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCY, A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT, A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY,
CHARITABLE INSTITUTIONS, OR A PRIVATE ENTITY OR PARTY;
(13) EXERCISE POWER USUALLY POSSESSED BY A PRIVATE
CORPORATION IN PERFORMING SIMILAR FUNCTIONS UNLESS TO DO SO WOULD
CONFLICT WITH STATE LAW;

HOUSE BILL 1452
(14) WITH THE OWNER’S PERMISSION, ENTER LANDS OR PREMISES TO
MAKE A SURVEY, A SOUNDING, A BORING, OR AN EXAMINATION TO ACCOMPLISH THE
PURPOSE AUTHORIZED BY THIS SUBTITLE;
(15) CREATE, OWN, CONTROL, OR BE A MEMBER OF A CORPORATION,
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY;
(16) CREATE A SPECIAL DISTRICT BENEFIT FOR THE COMMERCIAL
BUSINESSES IN THE TARGET AREA;
(17) OPEN A BANK ACCOUNT WITH A NATIONAL OR LOCAL FEDERALLY
INSURED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION;
(18) SET SALARIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE JURISDICTION MARKET
RATE AND OUTSIDE THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSION SYSTEM;
(19) CREATE A FORUM FOR STAKEHOLDERS TO COME TOGETHER ON
CREATING A 20–YEAR COMPREHENSIVE PLAN AROUND ECONOMIC, HOUSING,
TRANSPORTATION, NEIGHBORHOOD, AND GREEN SPACE DEVELOPMENT WITHIN
THE TARGET AREA;
(20) SERVE AS A CLEARINGHOUSE AND RESOURCE CENTER FOR
PROMOTING COORDINATION AND COMMUNICATION ON DEVELOPMENT
OPPORTUNITIES FOR THE SUITLAND ROAD AND SILVER HILL ROAD INTERSECTION
CORRIDOR;
(21) ENSURE MONEY IS BEING SPENT EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY
ON DEVELOPMENT AND THAT DEVELOPMENT IS HAPPENING IN THE APPROPRIATE
WAY FOR THE SUITLAND ROAD AND SILVER HILL ROAD INTERSECTION CORRIDOR;
(22) PROVIDE ADVISORY SERVICES TO STATE AND PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY AGENCIES ON PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR THE TARGET AREA;
(23) INITIATE, FUND, AND MONITOR FOR EFFICIENCY AND
EFFECTIVENESS ECONOMIC, HOUSING, TRANSPORTATION, NEIGHBORHOOD, AND
GREEN SPACE DEVELOPMENT WITHIN THE TARGET AREA;
(24) MAKE RULES AND REGULATIONS FOR THE OPERATION AND USE
OF LAND, PROPERTY, AND UNDERTAKINGS UNDER THE AUTHORITY’S
JURISDICTION; AND
(25) DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE
POWERS EXPRESSLY GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1452 13
12–1211.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ESTABLISH A SYSTEM OF FINANCIAL
ACCOUNTING, CONTROLS, AUDITS, AND REPORTS.
(B) THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE AUTHORITY BEGINS ON JULY 1 AND ENDS ON
THE FOLLOWING JUNE 30.
12–1212.
(A) THE AUTHORITY MAY CREATE AND ADMINISTER THE ACCOUNTS THAT
THE AUTHORITY REQUIRES.
(B) THE AUTHORITY SHALL DEPOSIT ITS MONEY INTO A PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY OR NATIONAL BANK OR A FEDERALLY INSURED SAVINGS AND LOAN
ASSOCIATION THAT HAS A TOTAL PAID–IN CAPITAL OF AT LEAST $1,000,000.
(C) THE AUTHORITY MAY DESIGNATE THE TRUST DEPARTMENT OF A
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY OR NATIONAL BANK OR SAVINGS AND LOAN
ASSOCIATION AS A DEPOSITORY TO RECEIVE SECURITIES THAT THE AUTHORITY
OWNS OR ACQUIRES.
12–1213.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION OR ASSESSMENTS ON ANY PART OF A
DEVELOPMENT OR PROJECT, THE AUTHORITY’S ACTIVITIES IN OPERATING AND
MAINTAINING A DEVELOPMENT OR PROJECT, AND REVENUES FROM A
DEVELOPMENT OR PROJECT.
(B) ANY PROPERTY THAT IS SOLD OR LEASED BY THE AUTHORITY TO A
PRIVATE ENTITY IS SUBJECT TO PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY AND LOCAL REAL
PROPERTY TAXES FROM THE TIME OF SALE OR LEASE.
(C) THE AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT FROM STATE AND LOCAL TRANSFER AND
RECORDATION TAX.
(D) THE AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES AND USE TAX ON
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS FOR A PROJECT IN THE TARGET AREA OF THE BUFFER
ZONE.
12–1214.

HOUSE BILL 1452
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY FUND.
(B) THERE IS A SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDS FOR THE
AUTHORITY TO USE FOR CONSULTING FEES, SALARIES, AND ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENSES.
(D) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES AND TO
CARRY OUT THE FUNCTIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND IN
THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the

HOUSE BILL 1452 15
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY FUND.
11–203.
(L) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THIS DIVISION II DOES NOT APPLY TO THE SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ARTICLE.
(2) THE SUITLAND DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE IS
SUBJECT TO TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 AND TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.